North Dakota, session 69, SB2035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsections 7 and 21 of section 53-06.1-01 of the North
Dakota Century Code are amended and reenacted as follows:
7. "Educational organization" means a nonprofit public or private elementary or
secondary school, two-year or four-year college, or university. The term includes a
collegiate athletic organization and an educational public service organization when
providing educational activities.
21. "Public-spirited organization" means an organization whosethe primary purpose of
which is for scientific research, amateur sports competition, safety, literaryliterature,
arts, preservation of cultural heritage, educational activities, educational public service,
youth, economic development, tourism, community medical care, community
recreation, or similar organization, which does not meet the definition of any other type
of eligible organization. However, a nonprofit organization or a group of people
recognized as a public-spirited organization by a governing body of a city or county for
obtaining a permit does not need to meet this definitionany other organization, or
group recognized by a governing body of a city or county, organized and operated not
for pecuniary profit or gain but for the primary purpose of improving or alleviating a
condition of public concern within the state or conferring a direct benefit on the
community at large. The term does not include a nonprofit club, association, or
Page No. 1 25.0280.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
organization, the primary purpose of which is to provide a direct benefit to its officers
or members.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-03 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. An organization recognized as aA public-spirited organization or group
recognized by the governing body of a city or county may apply for permits. A
local permit may allow the organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, or sports
pools. A restricted event permit may allow the organization to conduct only raffles,
bingo, sports pools, paddlewheels, twenty-one, and poker. The organization or
closely related organizations as a whole may only award a primary prize that
does not exceed eight thousand dollars and total prizes of all games do not
exceed forty thousand dollars per year. These maximum prize amounts do not
apply to raffles conducted under chapter 20.1-08. The determination of what is a
"public-spirited organization" is within the sole discretion of the governing body.
An organization shall disclose on the application its intended use of the net
income from the gaming activity. A governing body may issue a permit for games
to be held at designated times and places.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 53-06.1-10.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The maximum cash prize limits of this section do not apply to a public-spiritedan
educational organization that supports amateur collegiate athletics.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 2 of section 53-06.1-11.1 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. Uses benefiting an indefinite number of persons by bringing them under the
influence of education, cultural programs, or religion which include disbursements
to provide:
(1) Scholarships for students, if the disbursement is deposited in a scholarship
fund for defraying the cost of education to students and the scholarships are
awarded through an open and fair selection process.
(2) Supplementary assistance to a public or private nonprofit educational
institution registered with or accredited by any state.
Page No. 2 25.0280.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(3) Assistance to libraries and museums.
(4) Assistance for the performing arts and humanities.
(5) Preservation of cultural heritage.
(6) Youth community, and social welfare, and athletic activities.
(7) Adult amateur athletic activities within the state, including team uniforms
and equipment.
(8) Maintenance of places of public worship or support of a body of
communicants, gathered in common membership for mutual support and
edification in piety, worship, or religious observances.
(9)(8) Scientific research.
SECTION 5. APPLICATION. This Act applies to an eligible organization applying for or
renewing a license after the effective date of this Act.
Page No. 3 25.0280.01000